Washington statutes.
RCW 26.55.040

Filing of Canadian domestic violence protection order.

(1) A person entitled to protection who has a Canadian domestic violence protection order may file that order by presenting a certified, authenticated, or exemplified copy of the Canadian domestic violence protection order to a clerk of the court of a Washington court according to RCW 7.105.075. Any out-of-state department, agency, or court responsible for maintaining protection order records, may by facsimile or electronic transmission send a reproduction of the foreign protection order to the clerk of the court of Washington as long as it contains a facsimile or digital signature by any person authorized to make such transmission.

(2) An individual filing a Canadian domestic violence protection order under this section shall also file a declaration signed under penalty of perjury stating that, to the best of the individual's knowledge, the order is valid and in effect.

(3) On receipt of a certified, authenticated, or exemplified copy of a Canadian domestic violence protection order and declaration signed under penalty of perjury stating that, to the best of the individual's knowledge, the order is valid and in effect, the clerk of the court shall file the order in accordance with this section.

(4) After a Canadian domestic violence protection order is filed under this section, the clerk of the court shall provide the individual filing the order a certified copy of the filed order.

(5) A fee may not be charged for the filing of a Canadian domestic violence protection order under this section.

[ 2021 c 215 s 83; 2019 c 263 s 905.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.